Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that restricting investment in Washington's cannabis industry solely to Washington residents has created a significant and unnecessary barrier, one that does not exist in other state-regulated cannabis markets or any other industry nationwide. This restriction prevents cannabis businesses from accessing the standard tools needed for growth and innovation. While current regulations permit lending and financing, direct investment, such as angel investment, venture capital, and equity investment, is a critical mechanism for businesses across all industries to expand, particularly for those lacking personal wealth. Without access to these resources, small businesses are left at a distinct disadvantage compared to larger, well-funded ventures and competitors in other states.(2) The legislature further finds that this restriction was originally enacted when Washington became the first state to legalize cannabis, as a precaution to avoid potential federal enforcement. However, as cannabis legalization has expanded across the nation, every other state with legal cannabis has adopted regulatory structures without such a residency requirement. To date, no federal action has been taken against these states' systems, underscoring the outdated nature of Washington's restrictive policy.(3) The legislature further finds that eliminating the in-state residency requirement for investors is essential to creating a level playing field. At the same time, maintaining strict transparency requirements for all qualified investors ensures accountability and preserves the integrity of Washington's cannabis industry.(4) The legislature also recognizes that a well-balanced regulatory structure fosters economic growth while preserving the state's high regulatory standards. Such a framework is essential for maintaining a vibrant and sustainable cannabis marketplace that serves all Washingtonians. However, oversupply issues have arisen from the issuance of excessive producer licenses, creating uncertainty in the market. Suspending inactive producer licenses until an interstate or federal cannabis marketplace is established will address this challenge and promote stability.(5) Therefore, the legislature intends to expand access to investment opportunities for Washington's cannabis businesses, empower locally grown and produced cannabis enterprises to compete effectively in the national market, support smaller, community-based businesses in building resilience against larger, well-capitalized entities, and address oversupply challenges by suspending inactive producer licenses until a federal marketplace emerges.Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.325 and 2022 c 16 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a cannabis producer's license regulated by the board and subject to annual renewal. The licensee is authorized to produce: (a) Cannabis for sale at wholesale to cannabis processors and other cannabis producers; (b) immature plants or clones and seeds for sale to cooperatives as described under RCW 69.51A.250; and (c) immature plants or clones and seeds for sale to qualifying patients and designated providers as provided under RCW 69.51A.310. The production, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of cannabis in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed cannabis producer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every cannabis producer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant((,))in accordance with RCW 69.50.331 and shall specify the location at which the cannabis producer intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington((, and the)). The holder ((thereof))of the cannabis producer's license shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a cannabis producer's license ((shall be two hundred fifty dollars))is $250 plus any additional application or licensing fee required under RCW 69.50.331(1). The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a cannabis producer's license ((shall be one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars))is $1,381. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a cannabis producer intends to produce cannabis.(2) There shall be a cannabis processor's license to process, package, and label cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products for sale at wholesale to cannabis processors and cannabis retailers, regulated by the board and subject to annual renewal. The processing, packaging, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of cannabis, useable cannabis, cannabis-infused products, and cannabis concentrates in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW and the rules adopted to implement and enforce these chapters, by a validly licensed cannabis processor, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every cannabis processor's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant((,))in accordance with RCW 69.50.331 and shall specify the location at which the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington((, and the)). The holder ((thereof))of the cannabis processor's license shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a cannabis processor's license ((shall be two hundred fifty dollars))is $250 plus any additional application or licensing fee required under RCW 69.50.331(1). The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a cannabis processor's license ((shall be one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars))is $1,381. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a cannabis processor intends to process cannabis.(3)(a) There shall be a cannabis retailer's license to sell cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products at retail in retail outlets, regulated by the board and subject to annual renewal. The possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed cannabis retailer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every cannabis retailer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant((,))in accordance with RCW 69.50.331 and shall specify the location of the retail outlet the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington((, and the)). The holder ((thereof))of the cannabis retailer's license shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a cannabis retailer's license ((shall be two hundred fifty dollars))is $250 plus any additional application or licensing fee required under RCW 69.50.331(1). The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a cannabis retailer's license ((shall be one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars))is $1,381. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a cannabis retailer intends to sell cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products.(b) An individual retail licensee and all other persons or entities with a financial or other ownership interest in the business operating under the license are limited, in the aggregate, to holding a collective total of not more than five retail cannabis licenses.(c)(i) A cannabis retailer's license is subject to forfeiture in accordance with rules adopted by the board pursuant to this section.(ii) The board shall adopt rules to establish a license forfeiture process for a licensed cannabis retailer that is not fully operational and open to the public within a specified period from the date of license issuance, as established by the board, subject to the following restrictions:(A) No cannabis retailer's license may be subject to forfeiture within the first nine months of license issuance; and(B) The board must require license forfeiture on or before twenty-four calendar months of license issuance if a cannabis retailer is not fully operational and open to the public, unless the board determines that circumstances out of the licensee's control are preventing the licensee from becoming fully operational and that, in the board's discretion, the circumstances warrant extending the forfeiture period beyond ((twenty-four))24 calendar months.(iii) The board has discretion in adopting rules under this subsection (3)(c).(iv) ((This subsection (3)(c) applies to cannabis retailer's licenses issued before and after July 23, 2017. However, no license of a cannabis retailer that otherwise meets the conditions for license forfeiture established pursuant to this subsection (3)(c) may be subject to forfeiture within the first nine calendar months of July 23, 2017.(v))) The board may not require license forfeiture if the licensee has been incapable of opening a fully operational retail cannabis business due to actions by the city, town, or county with jurisdiction over the licensee that include any of the following:(A) The adoption of a ban or moratorium that prohibits the opening of a retail cannabis business; or(B) The adoption of an ordinance or regulation related to zoning, business licensing, land use, or other regulatory measure that has the effect of preventing a licensee from receiving an occupancy permit from the jurisdiction or which otherwise prevents a licensed cannabis retailer from becoming operational.(d) The board may issue cannabis retailer licenses pursuant to this chapter and RCW 69.50.335.Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.331 and 2023 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For the purpose of considering any application for a license to produce, process, research, transport, or deliver cannabis, useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, or cannabis-infused products subject to the regulations established under RCW 69.50.385, or sell cannabis, or for the renewal of a license to produce, process, research, transport, or deliver cannabis, useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, or cannabis-infused products subject to the regulations established under RCW 69.50.385, or sell cannabis, the board must conduct a comprehensive, fair, and impartial evaluation of the applications timely received.(a) The board may cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension, revocation, cancellation, or renewal or denial thereof, of any license, the board may consider any prior criminal arrests or convictions of the applicant, any public safety administrative violation history record with the board, and a criminal history record information check. The board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The board must require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW do not apply to these cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the board may, in its discretion, grant or deny the renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based on, without limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity documented in objections submitted pursuant to subsections (7)(c) and (10) of this section. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the board to any staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting this authority must be adopted by rule.(b) No license of any kind may be issued to:(i) A person under the age of 21 years;(ii) ((A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not lawfully resided in the state for at least six months prior to applying to receive a license;(iii) A partnership, employee cooperative, association, nonprofit corporation, or corporation))An entity unless formed under the laws of this state((, and unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license as provided in this section)); or(((iv)))(iii) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee.(c)(i) A person is not required to be a resident of this state and an entity with a certificate of registration is not required to be formed under the laws of this state to qualify for a cannabis license under this chapter, subject to the following requirements:(A) A natural person holding an ownership interest of more than 10 percent in the entity must qualify for and be named on the license;(B) Except as provided in (c)(i)(C) of this subsection, a natural person holding an ownership interest of 10 percent or less in the entity is not required to qualify for or be named on the license;(C) If no natural person holds an ownership interest of more than 10 percent in the entity, the natural person with the largest ownership interest must qualify for and be named on the license; and(D) Directors of the entity must possess the same qualifications required of the licensee.(ii) The identification of a natural person holding an ownership interest of 10 percent or less but more than one percent in the entity, who is not otherwise required to qualify for and be named on the license as provided in (c)(i) of this subsection, must be disclosed to the board.(d) The board may impose additional licensing fees to recover additional costs incurred in investigating a nonresident required to be investigated under this section. If, after reasonable efforts, the board is unable to investigate a nonresident required to be investigated under this section, in accordance with the investigatory standards applicable to the investigation of a state resident, the board may deny a license or license renewal to an entity.(2)(a) The board may, in its discretion, subject to RCW 43.05.160, 69.50.563, 69.50.562, 69.50.334, and 69.50.342(3) suspend or cancel any license; and all protections of the licensee from criminal or civil sanctions under state law for producing, processing, researching, or selling cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products thereunder must be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.(b) The board must immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license is automatic upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.(c)(i) The board must suspend a cannabis producer's license issued under RCW 69.50.325 if no activity has been recorded on the license between July 1, 2023, and December 31, 2024.(ii) A cannabis producer's license suspended under (c)(i) of this subsection must be reissued to the licensee when:(A) Federal law allows for the interstate transfer of cannabis between authorized cannabis-related businesses; or(B) The United States department of justice issues an opinion or memorandum allowing or tolerating the interstate transfer of cannabis between authorized cannabis-related businesses.(iii) For the purposes of this subsection, "no activity" refers to a cannabis producer's license with a unified business identifier number under which no business activity has been reported to the department of revenue.(d) The board may request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, examine witnesses, receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, and consider mitigating and aggravating circumstances in any case and deviate from any prescribed penalty, under rules the board may adopt.(((d)))(e) Witnesses must be allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.(((e)))(f) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the board or a subpoena issued by the board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative law judge, compels obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court or a refusal to testify therein.(3) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee must forthwith deliver up the license to the board. Where the license has been suspended only, the board must return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The board must notify all other licensees in the county where the subject licensee has its premises of the suspension or cancellation of the license; and no other licensee or employee of another licensee may allow or cause any cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of the subject licensee.(4) Every license issued under this chapter is subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this chapter or by rules adopted by the board to implement and enforce this chapter. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in the issuance of an individual license must be listed on the face of the individual license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date.(5) Every licensee must post and keep posted its license, or licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises.(6) No licensee may employ any person under the age of 21 years.(7)(a) Before the board issues a new or renewed license to an applicant it must give notice of the application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the application is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns, or to the tribal government if the application is for a license within Indian country, or to the port authority if the application for a license is located on property owned by a port authority.(b) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee selected by it, the county legislative authority or the official or employee selected by it, the tribal government, or port authority has the right to file with the board within twenty days after the date of transmittal of the notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant or against the premises for which the new or renewed license is asked. The board may extend the time period for submitting written objections upon request from the authority notified by the board.(c) The written objections must include a statement of all facts upon which the objections are based, and in case written objections are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request, and the board may in its discretion hold, a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal based on the written objections of an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority, the applicant may request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If a hearing is held at the request of the applicant, board representatives must present and defend the board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.(d) Upon the granting of a license under this title the board must send written notification to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (e) of this subsection, the board may not issue a license for any premises within 1,000 feet of the perimeter of the grounds of any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, public transit center, or library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to persons aged 21 years or older.(b) A city, county, or town may permit the licensing of premises within 1,000 feet but not less than 100 feet of the facilities described in (a) of this subsection, except elementary schools, secondary schools, and playgrounds, by enacting an ordinance authorizing such distance reduction, provided that such distance reduction will not negatively impact the jurisdiction's civil regulatory enforcement, criminal law enforcement interests, public safety, or public health.(c) A city, county, or town may permit the licensing of research premises allowed under RCW 69.50.372 within 1,000 feet but not less than 100 feet of the facilities described in (a) of this subsection by enacting an ordinance authorizing such distance reduction, provided that the ordinance will not negatively impact the jurisdiction's civil regulatory enforcement, criminal law enforcement, public safety, or public health.(d) The board may license premises located in compliance with the distance requirements set in an ordinance adopted under (b) or (c) of this subsection. Before issuing or renewing a research license for premises within 1,000 feet but not less than 100 feet of an elementary school, secondary school, or playground in compliance with an ordinance passed pursuant to (c) of this subsection, the board must ensure that the facility:(i) Meets a security standard exceeding that which applies to cannabis producer, processor, or retailer licensees;(ii) Is inaccessible to the public and no part of the operation of the facility is in view of the general public; and(iii) Bears no advertising or signage indicating that it is a cannabis research facility.(e) The board must issue a certificate of compliance if the premises met the requirements under (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection on the date of the application. The certificate allows the licensee to operate the business at the proposed location notwithstanding a later occurring, otherwise disqualifying factor.(f) The board may not issue a license for any premises within Indian country, as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151, including any fee patent lands within the exterior boundaries of a reservation, without the consent of the federally recognized tribe associated with the reservation or Indian country.(9) A city, town, or county may adopt an ordinance prohibiting a cannabis producer or cannabis processor from operating or locating a business within areas zoned primarily for residential use or rural use with a minimum lot size of five acres or smaller.(10) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal of any license, the board must give substantial weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated with the applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises. (("Chronic illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (b) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to law enforcement upon arrest.))(11) The board may not issue a cannabis retail license for any premises not currently licensed if:(a) The board receives a written objection from the legislative authority of an incorporated city or town, or county legislative authority, relating to the physical location of the proposed premises;(b) The objection to the location from the incorporated city or town, or county legislative authority, is received by the board within 20 days of the board notifying the incorporated city or town, or county legislative authority, of the proposed cannabis retail location; and(c) The objection to the issuance of a cannabis retail license at the specified location is based on a preexisting local ordinance limiting outlet density in a specific geographic area. For purposes of this subsection (11), a preexisting local ordinance is an ordinance enacted and in effect before the date the applicant submits an application for a cannabis retail license to the board identifying the premises proposed to be licensed. No objection related to the physical location of a proposed premises may be made by a local government under this subsection (11) based on a local ordinance enacted after the date the applicant submits an application for a cannabis retail license to the board identifying the premises proposed to be licensed.(12) After January 1, 2024, all cannabis licensees are encouraged but are not required to submit a social equity plan to the board. Upon confirmation by the board that a cannabis licensee who is not a social equity applicant, and who does not hold a social equity license issued under RCW 69.50.335, has submitted a social equity plan, the board must within 30 days reimburse such a licensee an amount equal to the cost of the licensee's annual cannabis license renewal fee. The license renewal fee reimbursement authorized under this subsection is subject to the following limitations:(a) The board may provide reimbursement one time only to any licensed entity; and(b) Any licensed entity holding more than one cannabis license is eligible for reimbursement of the license renewal fee on only one license.(13) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Chronic illegal activity" means: (i) A pervasive pattern of activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (ii) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to law enforcement upon arrest.(b) "Entity" has the meaning provided in RCW 23.95.105.(c) "Interest" has the meaning provided in RCW 23.95.105.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. This act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---